Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [609.2248] CASTRATION OR STERILIZATION OF MINORS. new text end new text begin A person who does any of the following to a person under the age of 18 years is guilty of a felony: new text end new text begin (1) physical or chemical castration; new text end new text begin (2) surgery on the genitalia or reproductive organs; or new text end new text begin (3) any surgery, procedure, or administration of drugs that results in the person being unable to conceive a child. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end